Utah statutes.
58-16a-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) (a)  Each license issued under this part shall be issued in accordance
with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.
(b)  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to
maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.
(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of
completion of continuing education as required under Section 58-16a-304.
(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the
license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
